th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > แอร์ฮอกกี้: อุปกรณ์แอร์ฮอกกี้; ชิ้นส่วนโต๊ะแอร์ฮอกกี้; โต๊ะเกมฮอกกี้
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Air hockey: Lufthockeyutrustning; Delar till air hockey-bord; Air hockey-bord
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Lufthockey: Utstyr til lufthockey; Deler til lufthockeybord; Lufthockeybord
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni hokej: Oprema za stolni hokej; Dijelovi stola za stolni hokej; Stolovi za stolni hokej
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Air hockey: Attrezzature per air hockey; Parti tavolo air hockey; Tavoli air hockey
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Léghoki: Léghoki-felszerelés; Léghokiasztal-alkatrészek; Léghokiasztalok
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Hava Hokeyi: Hava Hokeyi Ekipmanları; Hava Hokeyi Masa Parçaları; Hava Hokeyi Masaları
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Air hockey: Air hockey-benodigdheden; Onderdelen voor Air hockey-tafels; Air hockey-tafels
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Air Hockey: Équipement de air hockey; Pièces de table de hockey; Tables de Air hockey
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Khúc côn cầu bàn: Thiết bị chơi khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Bộ phận bàn hockey mini; Bàn chơi hockey mini
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 空氣曲棍球: 氣墊球裝備; 氣墊球桌零件; 氣墊球桌
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > エアホッケー用品: エアホッケー用具; エアホッケー台パーツ; エアホッケー台
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Oro ritulys: Oro ritulio įranga; Oro ritulio stalų dalys; Oro ritulio stalai
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Χόκεϊ αέρος: Εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ αέρος; Ανταλλακτικά τραπεζιού χόκεϊ αέρος; Τραπέζια χόκεϊ αέρος
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Zračni hokej: Oprema za zračni hokej; Deli za mizo za zračni hokej; Mize za zračni hokej
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Airhockey: Udstyr til airhockey; Airhockeyborde – dele; Airhockeyborde
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Vzdušný hokej: Vybavenie na vzdušný hokej; Diely stola na vzdušný hokej; Stoly na vzdušný hokej
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Air hockey: Sprzęt do air hockey'a; Części stołu do gry w air hockey; Stoły do gry w air hockey
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Аэрохоккей: Инвентарь для аэрохоккея; Детали для столов для аэрохоккея; Столы для аэрохоккея
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Hockey de mesa: Equipamiento para hockey de mesa; Piezas para mesas de hockey; Mesas de hockey
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Ilmakiekko: Ilmakiekkovälineet; Ilmakiekkopöydän osat; Ilmakiekkopöydät
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní hokej: Vybavení na stolní hokej; Díly stolů na stolní hokej; Stoly na stolní hokej
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Hóquei de ar: Equipamento de hóquei de ar; Peças de mesa de hóquei de ar; Mesas de hóquei de ar
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 空气曲棍球: 空气曲棍球设备; 气悬球桌配件; 气悬球桌
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Air-Hockey: Air-Hockey-Ausrüstung; Air-Hockey-Tischzubehör; Air-Hockey-Tische
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 에어 하키: 에어 하키 장비; 에어 하키대 부품; 에어 하키대
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Въздушен хокей: Оборудване за въздушен хокей; Части за маса за въздушен хокей; Маси за въздушен хокей
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Air Hockey: Air Hockey Equipment; Air Hockey Table Parts; Air Hockey Tables
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Hóquei aéreo: Equipamento de hóquei aéreo; Peças de mesa de hóquei aéreo; Mesas de hóquei aéreo
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Air hockey: Echipamente pentru air hockey; Piese masă de air hockey; Mese de air hockey